Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5407
Credits authorized.

Any taxpayer who qualifies for the incentives by adding the number of employees, wages, and investment required in section 77-5405 shall be entitled to:

(1) A credit equal to five percent of the amount by which the total compensation paid during the year exceeds the average compensation paid at the project multiplied by the number of equivalent base-year employees. For the computation of such credit, average compensation means the total compensation paid at the project divided by the total number of equivalent employees at the project; and

(2) A credit equal to ten percent of the investment made in qualified property at the project.

The credits prescribed in subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section shall be allowable for compensation paid and investments made during each year of the entitlement period that the taxpayer is at or above the required levels of employment, wages, and investment. The credits prescribed in subdivision (2) of this section shall also be allowable during the first year of the entitlement period for investment in qualified property at the project after the date of the application and before the required levels of employment, wages, and investment are met.

Laws 2000, LB 936, § 7.